Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7202
Purpose and intent.

The Quality Assessment and Improvement Act establishes criteria for the quality assessment activities of all health carriers that offer managed care plans and for the quality improvement activities of health carriers issuing closed plans or combination plans having a closed component. The purpose of the criteria is to enable health carriers to evaluate, maintain, and improve the quality of health care services provided to covered persons.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 52.